District of Columbia statutes.
7-702.03

Long-Term Care Ombudsman; appointment; vacancy — Training and experience.

(a)

The ombudsman shall have training and experience in the following areas:

(1)

Gerontology, long-term care, health care, or relevant social services program;

(2)

The legal system;

(3)

Dispute resolution techniques, including investigation, mediation, or negotiation; and

(4)

Long-term care advocacy.

(b)

No person who has been employed by a long-term care facility or a corporation that directly or indirectly owned or operated a long-term care facility within the past 2 years shall be an ombudsman.

(c)

Neither the ombudsman nor any member of his or her immediate family shall have any pecuniary interest in a long-term care facility.

Mar. 16, 1989, D.C. Law 7-218, § 203, 36 DCR 534
1981 Ed., § 6-3513.